Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 16 Teachers’ Retirement
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-16-1.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meanings:

“Active member” means any teacher as defined in this section for whom the retirement system is currently receiving regular contributions pursuant to §§

16-16-22

and

16-16-22.1

.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the words and phrases used in this chapter, so far as applicable, have the same meanings as they have in chapters 8 to 10 of title 36.

“Beneficiary” means any person in receipt of annuity, benefit, or retirement allowance from the retirement system as provided in this chapter.

“Child” includes a stepchild of a deceased member who has been a stepchild for at least one year immediately preceding the date on which the member died or an adopted child of a deceased member without regard to the length of time the child has been adopted.

“Former spouse divorced” means a person divorced from a deceased member, but only if the person meets one of the following conditions:

Is the mother or father of the deceased member’s child(ren);

Legally adopted the deceased member’s child(ren) while married to the deceased member and while the child(ren) was under the age of eighteen (18) years; or

Was married to the deceased member at the time both of them legally adopted a child(ren) under the age of eighteen (18) years.

“Member” means any person included in the membership of the retirement system under the provisions of this chapter.

“Prior service” means service as a teacher rendered prior to the first day of July, 1949, certified on his or her prior service certificate and allowable as prior service under the provisions of this chapter.

“Retired teacher” means any teacher who retired prior to July 1, 1949, pursuant to the provisions of G.L. 1938, ch. 195, as amended, and who on June 30, 1949, was in receipt of a pension under the provisions of that chapter.

“Retirement system” and “system” means the employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island created by chapter 8 of title 36, and “retirement board” means the board established under that chapter.

“Salary” or “compensation” includes any and all salary paid for teaching services regardless of whether any part of the salary or compensation is derived from any state or federal grant or appropriation for teachers’ salaries, as the term is defined in §

36-8-1(8)

. “Average compensation” shall be defined in accordance with section

36-8-1(5)(a)

.

“Service” means service as a teacher as described in subdivision (12) of this section. Periods of employment as teacher, principal, assistant principal, supervisor, superintendent, or assistant superintendent shall be combined in computing periods of service and employment.

“Spouse” means the surviving person who was married to a deceased member, but only if the surviving person meets one of the following conditions:

Was married to the deceased member for not less than one year immediately prior to the date on which the member died;

Is the mother or father of the deceased member’s child(ren);

Legally adopted the deceased member’s child(ren) while married to the deceased member and while the child(ren) was under the age of eighteen (18) years; or

Was married to the deceased member at the time both of them legally adopted a child(ren) under the age of eighteen (18) years.

“Teacher” means a person required to hold a certificate of qualification issued by or under the authority of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education and who is engaged in teaching as his or her principal occupation and is regularly employed as a teacher in the public schools of any city or town in the state, or any formalized, commissioner approved, cooperative service arrangement. The term includes a person employed as a teacher, supervisor, principal, assistant principal, superintendent, or assistant superintendent of schools, director, assistant director, coordinator, consultant, dean, assistant dean, educational administrator, nurse teacher, and attendance officer or any person who has worked in the field of education or is working in the field of education that holds a teaching or administrative certificate. In determining the number of days served by a teacher the total number of days served in any public school of any city or town in the state may be combined for any one school year. The term also includes a school business administrator whether or not the administrator holds a teaching or administrative certificate, and also includes occupational therapists and physical therapists licensed by the department of health and employed by a school committee in the state, or by any formalized, commissioner approved, cooperative service arrangement.

“Teaching” includes teaching, supervising, and superintending or assistant superintending of schools.

“Total service” means prior service as defined in subdivision (6) of this section, plus service rendered as a member of the system on or after the first day of July, 1949.

For purposes of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who, prior to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate and committed relationship with the decedent, and who certifies by affidavit that their relationship met the following qualifications:

Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to contract;

Neither partner was married to anyone else;

Partners were not related by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island;

Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of death; and

Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following:

Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;

Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;

Two (2) of: (I) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (II) joint checking account; (III) joint credit account; (IV) joint lease; and/or

The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will, retirement contract or life insurance.

The masculine pronoun wherever used shall also include the feminine pronoun.

Any term not specifically defined in this chapter and specifically defined in chapters 36-8 — 36-10 shall have the same definition as set forth in chapters 36-8 — 36-10.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 2; P.L. 1972, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 162, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 411, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 36; P.L. 2002, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10.

16-16-2.
Membership in system.

Membership in the retirement system for teachers began on July 1, 1949, and shall consist of:

All teachers as defined in this chapter who were in service on that date, and

All persons who become teachers on or after that date, which teachers shall become members of the system as a condition of their employment as teachers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-2

.

16-16-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-3

; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 169, § 1.

16-16-4.
Membership of school nurses.

Every certified nurse teacher employed in the respective public schools of the several cities and towns of this state and every person who, prior to any certification as a nurse teacher, has been regularly employed by any city or town as a school nurse in the respective public schools shall be entitled to all the rights and benefits contained in this chapter and in chapters 8 — 10 of title 36.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2192, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-4

; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 36.

16-16-5.
Service creditable.

In calculating “service”, “prior service”, or “total service” as defined in §

16-16-1

, every teacher shall be given credit for a year of service for each year in which he or she shall have served as a teacher; provided, that any teacher who through illness or leave of absence without pay does not serve a full school year may receive credit for a full school year of service by paying the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(9)

. Credit for leaves of absence shall be limited, in the aggregate, during the total service of a teacher to a period of four (4) years; provided, however, every teacher who had been required to resign for maternity reasons may receive credit for maternity reasons by making contribution to the system upon her return to teaching the amount she would have contributed to the retirement system, with regular interest, based upon her expected compensation but for her absence due to maternity reasons.

The retirement board shall fix and determine the time when and the conditions under which the payments shall be made.

Any teacher who serves or who has served during a school year the number of days that the public schools are required by law to be in session during the year shall be given credit for a year of service for that year. In determining the number of days served by a substitute teacher the total number of days served in any public school of any city or town in the state may be combined for any one school year. Any teacher shall be entitled to “prior service” credit for service prior to July 1, 1949, provided the teacher shall have been in service during the school year 1949-1950. The teacher shall be entitled to service credit for any year subsequent to July 1, 1949 in accordance with this chapter, by making contribution to the retirement system of the full actuarial cost for any such service credit.

Any teacher employed in at least a half (1/2) program including a job share program, or working at least half the number of days that the public schools are required to be in session, shall remain a contributing member and shall receive credit for that part-time service on a proportional basis. The purchase of any remaining program or job share time in which the teacher did not work shall not be permitted.

In computing service or in computing compensation, the retirement board shall credit no more than one year of service on account of all service in one calendar year.

Notwithstanding any other section of law, no member of the retirement system shall be permitted to purchase service credit for any portion of a year for which he or she is already receiving service credit in this retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-5

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 584, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 139, § 6; P.L. 1994, ch. 142, § 7; P.L. 1997, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 36; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10.

16-16-6.
Credit for service in private schools or as federal employee — Contributions.

In determining the creditable service of any teacher employed in any city or town for the purposes of retirement there may be added to, and included in, total service as defined in this chapter not more than five (5) years of service as a teacher or in a capacity essentially similar or equivalent to that of a teacher in any private school or institution, in any charter school not subject to subdivision 16-77-4(b)(12), and in public schools in which the teacher was paid by funds of the United States government except schools or institutions that are operated for profit; provided, however, that this service shall not be counted as creditable service unless the member shall pay into the retirement system a contribution equal to the full actuarial value of each year of credit for which application is made based on the salary of the member in effect at the date of application for the credit as determined by the retirement board. The retirement board shall fix and determine the time when and the conditions under which the payments shall be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-6

; P.L. 1963, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 38, § 3.

16-16-6.1.
Credit for service outside state.

In determining the creditable service of any teacher employed in any city or town for the purpose of retirement, there may be added to, and included in, total service as defined in this chapter not more than five (5) years of service as a teacher in the public school outside this state; provided, however, this service shall not be counted as creditable service unless the member shall pay into the retirement system a contribution equal to the full actuarial value of each year of credit for which application is made based upon the teacher’s compensation at the time he or she makes application to purchase credit for each year of service for which he or she claims credit.

Credit for service outside the state which is purchased under paragraph (a) above may also be used for retirement purposes under the provisions of subsection (a) for teachers who retire on ordinary disability under §

16-16-14

provided these teachers have at least ten (10) years creditable service within the state.

The term “outside this state” means service in any state college, university, school, or public school in any other state of the United States, or in any territory or possession of the United States, including the Philippine Islands, or in any school under the jurisdiction of the United States government.

The retirement board shall fix and determine by rules and regulations the time when and the conditions under which payments shall be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 8, § 3; P.L. 1972, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 346, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 36; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10.

16-16-6.2.
Service credit for appropriate work experience — Contributions.

In determining the creditable service of any vocational education teacher employed in any city or town or by the state for the purpose of retirement or a service retirement allowance (not including a deferred retirement allowance), there may be added to, and included in, total service as defined in this chapter not more than five (5) years of “appropriate work experience” pursuant to § 16-60-4(9)(ii). This service shall not be counted as creditable service unless the member shall pay into the retirement system a contribution equal to the full actuarial costs for each year of service for which he or she claims credit.

Credit for “appropriate work experience” which is purchased under paragraph (a) above may also be used for retirement purposes under the provisions of subsection (a) for teachers who retire on ordinary disability under §

16-16-14

, provided those teachers have at least ten (10) years’ creditable service.

The term “appropriate work experience” means service in any industry, business, or other appropriate enterprise for which certification credit has been given pursuant to the “standards and qualifications for certification of teachers” as provided in § 16-60-4(9)(ii).

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 497, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 434, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 599, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 36; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10.

16-16-6.3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 10; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

16-16-6.4.
Service credit for appropriate work experience — Certified nurse teachers — Contributions.

In determining the creditable service of any certified nurse teacher employed by the state or by any city or town for the purpose of retirement or a service retirement allowance (not including a deferred retirement allowance), there may be added to, and included in, total service as defined in this chapter not more than four (4) years of “appropriate work experience.” The service shall not be counted as creditable service unless the member shall pay into the retirement system a contribution equal to the full actuarial costs for each year of the service for which the member claims credit.

Credit for “appropriate work experience” which is purchased under paragraph (a) above may also be used for retirement purposes under the provisions of subsection (a) for certified nurse teachers who retire on ordinary disability under §

36-10-13

or §

16-16-14

, provided the certified nurse teachers have at least ten (10) years’ creditable service.

The term “appropriate work experience” for the purposes of a certified nurse teacher means service in any industry, business, or other appropriate enterprise where a member has worked as a registered nurse and for which no credit for the purposes of retirement has been granted for either teaching in a school of nursing or for any other appropriate work experience; provided, however, that no member shall be allowed credit for more than a total of four (4) years of service credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 591, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 538, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 36; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10.

16-16-7.
Credit for military leave.

Any teacher who has been granted or shall be granted an official leave of absence by his or her superiors to enter the armed services of the United States shall have his or her service counted in his or her years of teaching, and his or her leave of absence shall in no way interrupt the continuity of his or her teaching service which for the purpose of computing retirement benefits under the state retirement system shall be deemed to be continuous service, provided the teacher was teaching for a minimum of six (6) months immediately prior to entry into the armed services and returned or returns to active teaching within one year following the date of his or her honorable discharge from the armed services, but in no event shall the credit exceed a maximum of four (4) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-7

; P.L. 1972, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 348, § 2.

16-16-7.1.
Armed service credit.

Any active teacher who served on active duty in the armed service of the United States or in the merchant marine service of the United States as defined in § 2 of Chapter 1721 of the Public Laws, 1946, may purchase credit for that service up to a maximum of four (4) years; provided that he or she has received an honorable discharge; provided further, that any teacher on an official leave of absence for illness or injury shall be eligible to purchase military credits as defined herein while on that leave of absence.

The cost to purchase these credits shall be ten percent (10%) of the member’s first year’s earnings as a teacher as defined in §

16-16-1

of this title, multiplied by the number of years and fraction of the years of the armed service up to a maximum of four (4) years.

There will be no interest charged provided the teacher makes that purchase during his or her first five (5) years of membership in the retirement system, but will be charged regular interest to date of purchase from date of enrollment into membership, if purchased after completing five (5) years of membership; provided, however, any teacher who was in the retirement system prior to July 1, 1980, would not be charged interest whenever he or she purchases the armed services credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 173, § 4; P.L. 1981, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 425, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 463, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 510, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 169, § 1.

16-16-7.2.
Peace corps, teacher corps, and volunteers in service to America — Credit.

Any active teacher who served in the peace corps, teacher corps, or in volunteers in service to America may purchase credit for that service, up to a maximum of four (4) years. Any teacher on an official leave of absence for illness or injury shall be eligible to purchase the credits while on the leave of absence.

The cost to purchase these credits shall be the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 423, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 524, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 473, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10.

16-16-8.
Credit for service as a state or municipal employee.

Any member who shall have rendered service as a state employee as defined by the provisions of chapter 17 of this title and chapters 8 — 10 of title 36 or who shall have rendered service as an employee of a participating municipality, as defined by chapter 21 of title 45, shall be entitled to credit for his or her service for the various purposes of this system, provided the member shall have been a contributing member for that period. All contributions made by the member shall be transferred in toto to this system for the periods of service and the retirement system shall calculate the full actuarial value of the accrued benefit with the former employer. If the full actuarial value of the accrued benefit with the former employer is greater than the total employee contributions transferred, the retirement system shall also transfer the difference between full actuarial value of the accrued benefit with the former employer and the employee’s contributions from the account of the former employer to the account of the current employer. In any case in which a member shall have received a refund or refunds of contributions made to the system, the allowance of the credit for service shall be conditioned upon the repayment of the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

. Any service as defined in this section for which no contributions were made may be granted provided the member pays to the retirement system the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

. The retirement board shall fix and determine the rules and regulations needed to govern the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-8

; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 435, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 70, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 291, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10.

16-16-8.1.
Purchase of service credits payable by installment.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or of any other public or general law to the contrary, the retirement board shall permit individuals who purchase service credit to do so in installments. The retirement board shall create, by rule and regulation, provisions allowing that individuals purchasing service credit may do so on an installment plan by payroll deduction not to exceed five (5) years, provided that all purchases must be made prior to retirement. The retirement board shall charge interest at the actuarial assumed rate of return adopted by the board for purchases made on an installment plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 269, § 1.

16-16-9, 16-16-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 6; G.L. 1956, §§

16-16-9

, 16-16-10; P.L. 1961, ch. 121, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. II, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

16-16-11.
Benefits payable — Survivor’s benefits.

The benefits payable to teachers under this chapter shall be those benefits provided in chapter 10 of title 36 and as provided in this chapter with and subject, however, to the conditions and modifications set forth in §§

16-16-12

through

16-16-14

, and also the benefits provided in subsection (b) of this section.

If the teacher member of the retirement system dies, either prior to or after his or her effective date of retirement, any amounts credited to him or her in the teachers’ survivors benefit fund, as provided in this chapter, with regular accumulated interest on the amount, shall be applied toward the financing of those benefits for dependents and survivors of the member as defined in this chapter, and in amounts provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-11

; P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 1.

16-16-12.
Procedure for service retirement.

Retirement of a member on a service retirement allowance shall be made by the retirement board as follows:

Any member may retire upon his or her written application to the retirement board as of the first day of the calendar month in which the application was filed, provided the member was separated from service prior to filing the application, and further provided however, that if separation from service occurs during the month in which the application is filed, the effective date shall be the first day following the separation from service, and provided further that the member on retirement date has attained the age of sixty (60) years and has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, or regardless of age has completed twenty-eight (28) years of total service and has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, and who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.

For teachers who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2012, benefits are available to teachers who have attained the age of sixty-two (62) and completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service. For teachers in service as of October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but became eligible to retire prior to July 1, 2012, the minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62) will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September 30, 2009. The proportional formula shall work as follows:

The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62).

The formula shall then take the teacher’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009, as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (A) as the denominator.

The fraction determined in (B) shall then be multiplied by the age difference in (1) to apply a reduction in years from age sixty-two (62).

Any member, who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, may retire upon his or her written application to the retirement board as of the first day of the calendar month in which the application was filed; provided, the member was separated from service prior thereto; and further provided, however, that if separation from service occurs during the month in which application is filed, the effective date shall be the first day following that separation from service; provided, the member on his or her retirement date had attained the age of fifty-nine (59) and had completed at least twenty-nine (29) years of total service; or provided, that the member on his or her retirement date had attained the age of sixty-five (65) and had completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service; or provided, that the member on his or her retirement date had attained the age of fifty-five (55) and had completed twenty (20) years of total service and provided, that the retirement allowance, as determined according to the formula in §

16-16-13

is reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the member is less than sixty-five (65) years and who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.

For teachers who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2012, benefits are available to teachers who have attained the age of sixty-two (62) and have completed at least twenty-nine (29) years of total service or have attained the age of sixty-five (65) and completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service. For teachers in service as of October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but become eligible to retire prior to July 1, 2012, who have a minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62), the retirement age will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September 30, 2009. The proportional formula shall work as follows:

The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62).

The formula shall then take the teacher’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009, as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (A) as the denominator.

The fraction determined in (B) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined in (A) to apply a reduction in years from age sixty-two (62).

Effective July 1, 2012, the following shall apply to all teachers not eligible to retire prior to July 1, 2012:

A teacher with contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, shall be eligible to retire upon the completion of at least five (5) years of contributory service and attainment of the teacher’s Social Security retirement age.

For teachers with five (5) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012, with contributory service on and after July 1, 2012, who have a retirement age of Social Security Retirement Age, the retirement age will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the teacher has earned as of June 30, 2012, but in no event shall a teacher’s retirement age under this subparagraph (ii) be prior to the attainment of age fifty-nine (59) or prior to the teacher’s retirement age determined under the laws in effect on June 30, 2012. The proportional formula shall work as follows:

The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in effect on June 30, 2012, which shall then be subtracted from Social Security retirement age;

The formula shall then take the teacher’s total service credit as of June 30, 2012, as the numerator and the projected service at retirement age in effect on June 30, 2012, as the denominator;

The fraction determined in (2) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined in (1) to apply a reduction in years from Social Security retirement age.

Effective July 1, 2015, a teacher who has completed twenty (20) or more years of total service and who has attained an age within five (5) years of the eligible retirement age under subdivisions (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above or subsection (d) below, may elect to retire provided that the retirement allowance shall be reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the teacher is less than the eligible retirement age under subdivisions (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above or subsection (d) below in accordance with the following table:

Notwithstanding any other provisions of section §

16-16-12(c)

, a teacher who has completed ten (10) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012, may elect to retire at his or her eligible retirement date as determined under subsections (a) and (b) above provided that a teacher making an election under this paragraph shall receive the teacher’s retirement benefit determined and calculated based on the teacher’s service and average compensation as of June 30, 2012. This provision shall be interpreted and administered in a manner to protect a teacher’s accrued benefit on June 30, 2012.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of subsection (c) above, effective July 1, 2015, teachers in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the earlier of:

The attainment of at least age sixty-five (65) and the completion of at least thirty (30) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-four (64) and the completion of at least thirty-one (31) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-three (63) and the completion of at least thirty-two (32) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-two (62) and the completion of at least thirty-three (33) years of total service; or

The teacher’s retirement eligibility date under subsections (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above.

Except as specifically provided in §§

36-10-9.1

,

36-10-12

through

36-10-15

, and

45-21-19

through

45-21-22

, no member shall be eligible for pension benefits under this chapter unless

The member shall have been a contributing member of the employees’ retirement system for at least ten (10) years; or

For teachers in active contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, the teacher shall have been a contributing member of the employees’ retirement system for at least five (5) years.

(2)

Provided, however, a person who has ten (10) years service credit shall be vested; provided that for teachers in active contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, a teacher who has five (5) years of contributory service shall be vested.

(3)

Furthermore, any past service credits purchased in accordance with §

36-9-38

shall be counted towards vesting.

(4)

Any person who becomes a member of the employees’ retirement system pursuant to §

45-21-8

shall be considered a contributing member for the purpose of chapter 21 of title 45 and this chapter.

(5)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no more than five (5) years of service credit may be purchased by a member of the system. The five (5) year limit shall not apply to any purchases made prior to January 1, 1995. A member who has purchased more than five (5) years of service credit before January 1, 1995, shall be permitted to apply the purchases towards the member’s service retirement. However, no further purchase will be permitted.

(6)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, effective July 1, 2012, except for purchases under §§

16-16-7.1

,

36-5-3

,

36-9-31

,

36-10-10.4

, and

45-21-53

:

(i)

For service purchases for time periods prior to a teacher’s initial date of hire, the purchase must be made within three (3) years of the teacher’s initial date of hire; and

(ii)

For service purchases for time periods for official periods of leave as authorized by law, the purchase must be made within three (3) years of the time the official leave was concluded by the teacher. Notwithstanding paragraphs (i) and (ii) above, service purchases from time periods prior to June 30, 2012, may be made on or prior to June 30, 2015.

No member of the teachers’ retirement system shall be permitted to purchase service credits for casual or seasonal employment, for employment as a temporary or emergency employee, a page in the general assembly, or for employment at any state college or university while the employee is a student or graduate of the college or university.

Except as specifically provided in §§

16-16-6.2

and

16-16-6.4

, a member shall not receive service credit in this retirement system for any year or portion of a year which counts as service credit in any other retirement system in which the member is vested or from which the member is receiving a pension and/or any annual payment for life. This subsection shall not apply to any payments received pursuant to the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

A member who seeks to purchase or receive service credit in this retirement system shall have the affirmative duty to disclose to the retirement board whether or not he or she is a vested member in any other retirement system and/or is receiving a pension, retirement allowance, or any annual payment for life. The retirement board shall have the right to investigate as to whether or not the member has utilized the same time of service for credit in any other retirement system. The member has an affirmative duty to cooperate with the retirement board including, by way of illustration and not by way of limitation, the duty to furnish or have furnished to the retirement board any relevant information that is protected by any privacy act.

A member who fails to cooperate with the retirement board shall not have the time of service credit counted toward total service credit until the time the member cooperates with the retirement board and until the time the retirement board determines the validity of the service credit.

A member who knowingly makes a false statement to the retirement board regarding service time or credit shall not be entitled to a retirement allowance and is entitled only to the return of his or her contributions without interest.

Year Preceding Cumulative Annual Cumulative Monthly Retirement Reduction Reduction For Year 1 9% .75% For Year 2 8% .667% For Year 3 7% .583% For Year 4 7% .583% For Year 5 7% .583%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 4; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 7; P.L. 1955, ch. 3609, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-12

; P.L. 1962, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 143, § 3; P.L. 1963, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 2, § 2; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 1972, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 145, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 520, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 55, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 231, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 139, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 11.

16-16-12.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 180, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.